Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5016.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.28, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Disruption of worship services prohibited. new text end new text begin (a) A person who enters a religious establishment with the intent to disrupt a worship service that has a scheduled starting time and commits a crime within the religious establishment is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates paragraph (a) a second or subsequent time is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.28, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Definition. For purposes of deleted text begin subdivision 2deleted text end new text begin this sectionnew text end , deleted text begin adeleted text end "religious establishment" deleted text begin isdeleted text end new text begin meansnew text end a building used for worship services by a religious organization and clearly identified as such by a posted sign or other means. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end